California, session 20252026, SB597.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65912.131 of the Government Code is amended to read:65912.131. In addition to the requirements of Section 65912.130, a development of 50 or more housing units approved by a local government pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 65912.110) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 65912.120) shall meet all of the following labor standards:(a) The development proponent shall require in contracts with construction contractors and shall certify to the local government that each contractor of any tier who will employ construction craft employees or will let subcontracts for at least 1,000 hours shall satisfy the requirements in subdivisions (b) and (c). A construction contractor is deemed in compliance with subdivisions (b) and (c) if it is signatory to a valid collective bargaining agreement that requires utilization of registered apprentices and expenditures on health care for employees and dependents.(b) A contractor with construction craft employees shall either participate in an apprenticeship program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code, or request the dispatch of apprentices from a state-approved apprenticeship program under the terms and conditions set forth in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this subdivision.(c) Each contractor with construction craft employees shall make health care expenditures for each employee in an amount per hour worked on the development equivalent to at least the hourly pro rata cost of a Covered California Platinum level plan for two 40-year-old adults and two dependents 0 to 14 years of age for the Covered California rating area in which the development is located. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this subdivision. Qualifying expenditures shall be credited toward compliance with prevailing wage payment requirements set forth in Section 65912.130.(d) (1) The development proponent shall provide to the local government, on a monthly basis while its construction contracts on the development are being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with subdivisions (b) and (c). The reports shall be considered public records under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1), and shall be open to public inspection.(2) A development proponent that fails to provide the monthly report shall be subject to a civil penalty for each month for which the report has not been provided, in the amount of 10 percent of the dollar value of construction work performed by that contractor on the development in the month in question, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to comply with subdivision (b) or (c) shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of subdivision (b) or (c).(3) Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the development using the procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments specified in Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3 of the Labor Code.(e) Each construction contractor shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code. Each construction contractor shall submit payroll records directly to the Labor Commissioner at least monthly in a format prescribed by the Labor Commissioner in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code. The records shall include a statement of fringe benefits. Upon request by a joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), the records shall be provided pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1776 of the Labor Code.(f) All construction contractors shall report any change in apprenticeship program participation or health care expenditures to the local government within 10 business days, and shall reflect those changes on the monthly report. The reports shall be considered public records pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1) and shall be open to public inspection.(g) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) shall have standing to sue a construction contractor for failure to make health care expenditures pursuant to subdivision (c) in accordance with Section 218.7, 218.8, or 218.9 of the Labor Code.SEC. 2. Section 65913.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:65913.4. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (r), a development proponent may submit an application for a development that is subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process provided by subdivision (c) and is not subject to a conditional use permit or any other nonlegislative discretionary approval if the development complies with subdivision (b) and satisfies all of the following objective planning standards:(1) The development is a multifamily housing development that contains two or more residential units.(2) The development and the site on which it is located satisfy all of the following:(A) It is a legal parcel or parcels located in a city if, and only if, the city boundaries include some portion of either an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau, or, for unincorporated areas, a legal parcel or parcels wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.(B) At least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with urban uses. For the purposes of this section, parcels that are only separated by a street or highway shall be considered to be adjoined.(C) (i) A site that meets the requirements of clause (ii) and satisfies any of the following:(I) The site is zoned for residential use or residential mixed-use development.(II) The site has a general plan designation that allows residential use or a mix of residential and nonresidential uses.(III) The site meets the requirements of Section 65852.24.(ii) At least two-thirds of the square footage of the development is designated for residential use. Additional density, floor area, and units, and any other concession, incentive, or waiver of development standards granted pursuant to the Density Bonus Law in Section 65915 shall be included in the square footage calculation. The square footage of the development shall not include underground space, such as basements or underground parking garages.(3) (A) The development proponent has committed to record, prior to the issuance of the first building permit, a land use restriction or covenant providing that any lower or moderate-income housing units required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) shall remain available at affordable housing costs or rent to persons and families of lower or moderate income for no less than the following periods of time:(i) Fifty-five years for units that are rented.(ii) Forty-five years for units that are owned.(B) The city or county shall require the recording of covenants or restrictions implementing this paragraph for each parcel or unit of real property included in the development.(4) The development satisfies clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A) and satisfies subparagraph (B) below:(A) (i) For a development located in a locality that is in its sixth or earlier housing element cycle, the development is located in either of the following:(I) In a locality that the department has determined is subject to this clause on the basis that the number of units that have been issued building permits, as shown on the most recent production report received by the department, is less than the locality’s share of the regional housing needs, by income category, for that reporting period. A locality shall remain eligible under this subclause until the department’s determination for the next reporting period.(II) In a locality that the department has determined is subject to this clause on the basis that the locality did not adopt a housing element that has been found in substantial compliance with housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3) by the department. A locality shall remain eligible under this subclause until such time as the locality adopts a housing element that has been found in substantial compliance with housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3) by the department.(ii) For a development located in a locality that is in its seventh or later housing element cycle, is located in a locality that the department has determined is subject to this clause on the basis that the locality did not adopt a housing element that has been found in substantial compliance with housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3) by the department by the statutory deadline, or that the number of units that have been issued building permits, as shown on the most recent production report received by the department, is less than the locality’s share of the regional housing needs, by income category, for that reporting period. A locality shall remain eligible under this subparagraph until the department’s determination for the next reporting period.(B) The development is subject to a requirement mandating a minimum percentage of below market rate housing based on one of the following:(i) The locality did not adopt a housing element pursuant to Section 65588 that has been found in substantial compliance with the housing element law (Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3) by the department, did not submit its latest production report to the department by the time period required by Section 65400, or that production report submitted to the department reflects that there were fewer units of above moderate-income housing issued building permits than were required for the regional housing needs assessment cycle for that reporting period. In addition, if the project contains more than 10 units of housing, the project does one of the following:(I) For for-rent projects, the project dedicates a minimum of 10 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, to housing affordable to households making at or below 50 percent of the area median income. However, if the locality has adopted a local ordinance that requires that greater than 10 percent of the units be dedicated to housing affordable to households making below 50 percent of the area median income, that local ordinance applies.(II) For for-sale projects, the project dedicates a minimum of 10 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, to housing affordable to households making at or below 80 percent of the area median income. However, if the locality has adopted a local ordinance that requires that greater than 10 percent of the units be dedicated to housing affordable to households making below 80 percent of the area median income, that local ordinance applies.(III) (ia) If the project is located within the San Francisco Bay area, the project, in lieu of complying with subclause (I) or (II), may opt to abide by this subclause. Projects utilizing this subclause shall dedicate 20 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, to housing affordable to households making below 100 percent of the area median income with the average income of the units at or below 80 percent of the area median income. However, a local ordinance adopted by the locality applies if it requires greater than 20 percent of the units be dedicated to housing affordable to households making at or below 100 percent of the area median income, or requires that any of the units be dedicated at a level deeper than 100 percent. In order to comply with this subclause, the rent or sale price charged for units that are dedicated to housing affordable to households between 80 percent and 100 percent of the area median income shall not exceed 30 percent of the gross income of the household.(ib) For purposes of this subclause, “San Francisco Bay area” means the entire area within the territorial boundaries of the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma, and the City and County of San Francisco.(ii) (I) The locality’s latest production report reflects that there were fewer units of housing issued building permits affordable to either very low income or low-income households by income category than were required for the regional housing needs assessment cycle for that reporting period, and one of the following conditions exist:(ia) The project seeking approval dedicates 50 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, to housing affordable to households making at or below 80 percent of the area median income.(ib) The project application was submitted prior to January 1, 2019, and the project includes at least 500 units of housing, the project seeking approval or seeking a modification to a prior approval dedicates 20 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, as affordable units, with at least 9 percent affordable to households making at or below 50 percent of the area median income and the remainder affordable to households making at or below 80 percent of the area median income.(II) Notwithstanding the conditions described in sub-subclauses (ia) and (ib) of subclause (I), if the locality has adopted a local ordinance that requires that greater than 50 percent, or greater than 20 percent as applicable, of the units be dedicated to housing affordable to households making at or below 80 percent of the area median income, that local ordinance applies.(III) For purposes of this clause, the reference to units affordable to very low income households includes units affordable to acutely low income households, as defined in Section 50063.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and to extremely low income households, as defined in Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.(iii) The locality did not submit its latest production report to the department by the time period required by Section 65400, or if the production report reflects that there were fewer units of housing affordable to both income levels described in clauses (i) and (ii) that were issued building permits than were required for the regional housing needs assessment cycle for that reporting period, the project seeking approval may choose between utilizing clause (i) or (ii).(C) (i) A development proponent that uses a unit of affordable housing to satisfy the requirements of subparagraph (B) may also satisfy any other local or state requirement for affordable housing, including local ordinances or the Density Bonus Law in Section 65915, provided that the development proponent complies with the applicable requirements in the state or local law. If a local requirement for affordable housing requires units that are restricted to households with incomes higher than the applicable income limits required in subparagraph (B), then units that meet the applicable income limits required in subparagraph (B) shall be deemed to satisfy those local requirements for higher income units.(ii) A development proponent that uses a unit of affordable housing to satisfy any other state or local affordability requirement may also satisfy the requirements of subparagraph (B), provided that the development proponent complies with applicable requirements of subparagraph (B).(iii) A development proponent may satisfy the affordability requirements of subparagraph (B) with a unit that is restricted to households with incomes lower than the applicable income limits required in subparagraph (B).(D) The amendments to this subdivision made by the act adding this subparagraph do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.(5) The development, excluding any additional density or any other concessions, incentives, or waivers of development standards for which the development is eligible pursuant to the Density Bonus Law in Section 65915, is consistent with objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards in effect at the time that the development is submitted to the local government pursuant to this section, or at the time a notice of intent is submitted pursuant to subdivision (b), whichever occurs earlier. For purposes of this paragraph, “objective zoning standards,” “objective subdivision standards,” and “objective design review standards” mean standards that involve no personal or subjective judgment by a public official and are uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the development applicant or proponent and the public official before submittal. These standards may be embodied in alternative objective land use specifications adopted by a city or county, and may include, but are not limited to, housing overlay zones, specific plans, inclusionary zoning ordinances, and density bonus ordinances, subject to the following:(A) A development shall be deemed consistent with the objective zoning standards related to housing density, as applicable, if the density proposed is compliant with the maximum density allowed within that land use designation, notwithstanding any specified maximum unit allocation that may result in fewer units of housing being permitted.(B) In the event that objective zoning, general plan, subdivision, or design review standards are mutually inconsistent, a development shall be deemed consistent with the objective zoning and subdivision standards pursuant to this subdivision if the development is consistent with the standards set forth in the general plan.(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that the objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards described in this paragraph be adopted or amended in compliance with the requirements of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004.(D) The amendments to this subdivision made by the act adding this subparagraph do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.(E) A project that satisfies the requirements of Section 65852.24 shall be deemed consistent with objective zoning standards, objective design standards, and objective subdivision standards if the project is consistent with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 65852.24 and if none of the square footage in the project is designated for hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other transient lodging use, except for a residential hotel. For purposes of this subdivision, “residential hotel” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.(6) The development is not located on a site that is any of the following:(A) (i) An area of the coastal zone subject to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 30603 of the Public Resources Code.(ii) An area of the coastal zone that is not subject to a certified local coastal program or a certified land use plan.(iii) An area of the coastal zone that is vulnerable to five feet of sea level rise, as determined by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Ocean Protection Council, the United States Geological Survey, the University of California, or a local government’s coastal hazards vulnerability assessment.(iv) In a parcel within the coastal zone that is not zoned for multifamily housing.(v) In a parcel in the coastal zone and located on either of the following:(I) On, or within a 100-foot radius of, a wetland, as defined in Section 30121 of the Public Resources Code.(II) On prime agricultural land, as defined in Sections 30113 and 30241 of the Public Resources Code.(B) Either prime farmland or farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to the United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.(C) Wetlands, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).(D) Within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178, or within the state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102 of the Public Resources Code. This subparagraph does not apply to sites that have adopted fire hazard mitigation measures pursuant to existing building standards or state fire mitigation measures applicable to the development, including, but not limited to, standards established under all of the following or their successor provisions:(i) Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or Section 51182, as applicable.(ii) Section 4290 of the Public Resources Code.(iii) Chapter 7A of the California Building Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(E) A hazardous waste site that is listed pursuant to Section 65962.5 or a hazardous waste site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 25356 of the Health and Safety Code, unless either of the following apply:(i) The site is an underground storage tank site that received a uniform closure letter issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code based on closure criteria established by the State Water Resources Control Board for residential use or residential mixed uses. This section does not alter or change the conditions to remove a site from the list of hazardous waste sites listed pursuant to Section 65962.5.(ii) The State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Toxic Substances Control, or a local agency making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code, has otherwise determined that the site is suitable for residential use or residential mixed uses.(F) Within a delineated earthquake fault zone as determined by the State Geologist in any official maps published by the State Geologist, unless the development complies with applicable seismic protection building code standards adopted by the California Building Standards Commission under the California Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), and by any local building department under Chapter 12.2 (commencing with Section 8875) of Division 1 of Title 2.(G) Within a special flood hazard area subject to inundation by the 1 percent annual chance flood (100-year flood) as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this subparagraph and is otherwise eligible for streamlined approval under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site. A development may be located on a site described in this subparagraph if either of the following are met:(i) The site has been subject to a Letter of Map Revision prepared by the Federal Emergency Management Agency and issued to the local jurisdiction.(ii) The site meets Federal Emergency Management Agency requirements necessary to meet minimum flood plain management criteria of the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant to Part 59 (commencing with Section 59.1) and Part 60 (commencing with Section 60.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(H) Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the development has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If a development proponent is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to provide that the site satisfies this subparagraph and is otherwise eligible for streamlined approval under this section, a local government shall not deny the application on the basis that the development proponent did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site.(I) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.(J) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).(K) Lands under conservation easement.(7) The development is not located on a site where any of the following apply:(A) The development would require the demolition of the following types of housing:(i) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents to levels affordable to persons and families of moderate, low, or very low income.(ii) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.(iii) Housing that has been occupied by tenants within the past 10 years.(B) The site was previously used for housing that was occupied by tenants that was demolished within 10 years before the development proponent submits an application under this section.(C) The development would require the demolition of a historic structure that was placed on a national, state, or local historic register.(D) The property contains housing units that are occupied by tenants, and units at the property are, or were, subsequently offered for sale to the general public by the subdivider or subsequent owner of the property.(8) Except as provided in paragraph (9), a proponent of a development project approved by a local government pursuant to this section shall require in contracts with construction contractors, and shall certify to the local government, that the following standards specified in this paragraph will be met in project construction, as applicable:(A) A development that is not in its entirety a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and approved by a local government pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 65912.110) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 65912.120) shall be subject to all of the following:(i) All construction workers employed in the execution of the development shall be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.(ii) The development proponent shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work, and shall also provide notice of all contracts for the performance of the work to the Department of Industrial Relations, in accordance with Section 1773.35 of the Labor Code, for those portions of the development that are not a public work.(iii) All contractors and subcontractors for those portions of the development that are not a public work shall comply with all of the following:(I) Pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.(II) Maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section. This subclause does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subclause, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(III) Be registered in accordance with Section 1725.6 of the Labor Code.(B) (i) The obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to this paragraph may be enforced by any of the following:(I) The Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the development.(II) An underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action.(III) A joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code.(ii) If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued pursuant to this paragraph, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.(iii) This paragraph does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this clause, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing does not apply to those portions of a development that are not a public work if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker.(D) The requirement of this paragraph to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.(E) A development of 50 or more housing units approved by a local government pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following labor standards:(i) The development proponent shall require in contracts with construction contractors and shall certify to the local government that each contractor of any tier who will employ construction craft employees or will let subcontracts for at least 1,000 hours shall satisfy the requirements in clauses (ii) and (iii). A construction contractor is deemed in compliance with clauses (ii) and (iii) if it is signatory to a valid collective bargaining agreement that requires utilization of registered apprentices and expenditures on health care for employees and dependents.(ii) A contractor with construction craft employees shall either participate in an apprenticeship program approved by the California Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code, or request the dispatch of apprentices from a state-approved apprenticeship program under the terms and conditions set forth in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this clause.(iii) Each contractor with construction craft employees shall make health care expenditures for each employee in an amount per hour worked on the development equivalent to at least the hourly pro rata cost of a Covered California Platinum level plan for two adults 40 years of age and two dependents 0 to 14 years of age for the Covered California rating area in which the development is located. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this clause. Qualifying expenditures shall be credited toward compliance with prevailing wage payment requirements set forth in this paragraph.(iv) (I) The development proponent shall provide to the local government, on a monthly basis while its construction contracts on the development are being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with clauses (ii) and (iii). The reports shall be considered public records under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1) and shall be open to public inspection.(II) A development proponent that fails to provide the monthly report shall be subject to a civil penalty for each month for which the report has not been provided, in the amount of 10 percent of the dollar value of construction work performed by that contractor on the development in the month in question, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to comply with clauses (ii) and (iii) shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of clauses (ii) and (iii).(III) Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the development using the procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments specified in Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3 of the Labor Code.(v) Each construction contractor shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code. Each construction contractor shall submit payroll records directly to the Labor Commissioner at least monthly in a format prescribed by the Labor Commissioner in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code. The records shall include a statement of fringe benefits. Upon request by a joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), the records shall be provided pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1776 of the Labor Code.(vi) All construction contractors shall report any change in apprenticeship program participation or health care expenditures to the local government within 10 business days, and shall reflect those changes on the monthly report. The reports shall be considered public records pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1) and shall be open to public inspection.(vii) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) shall have standing to sue a construction contractor for failure to make health care expenditures pursuant to clause (iii) in accordance with Section 218.7, 218.8, or 218.9 of the Labor Code.(F) For any project over 85 feet in height above grade, the following skilled and trained workforce provisions apply:(i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the developer shall enter into construction contracts with prime contractors only if all of the following are satisfied:(I) The contract contains an enforceable commitment that the prime contractor and subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce, as defined in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code, to perform work on the project that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades. However, this enforceable commitment requirement shall not apply to any scopes of work where new bids are accepted pursuant to subclause (I) of clause (ii).(II) The developer or prime contractor shall establish minimum bidding requirements for subcontractors that are objective to the maximum extent possible. The developer or prime contractor shall not impose any obstacles in the bid process for subcontractors that go beyond what is reasonable and commercially customary. The developer or prime contractor must accept bids submitted by any bidder that meets the minimum criteria set forth in the bid solicitation.(III) The prime contractor has provided an affidavit under penalty of perjury that, in compliance with this subparagraph, it will use a skilled and trained workforce and will obtain from its subcontractors an enforceable commitment to use a skilled and trained workforce for each scope of work in which it receives at least three bids attesting to satisfaction of the skilled and trained workforce requirements.(IV) When a prime contractor or subcontractor is required to provide an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete a contract or project, the commitment shall be made in an enforceable agreement with the developer that provides the following:(ia) The prime contractor and subcontractors at every tier will comply with this chapter.(ib) The prime contractor will provide the developer, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance by the prime contractor.(ic) The prime contractor shall provide the developer, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, the monthly reports demonstrating compliance submitted to the prime contractor by the affected subcontractors.(ii) (I) If a prime contractor fails to receive at least three bids in a scope of construction work from subcontractors that attest to satisfying the skilled and trained workforce requirements as described in this subparagraph, the prime contractor may accept new bids for that scope of work. The prime contractor need not require that a skilled and trained workforce be used by the subcontractors for that scope of work.(II) The requirements of this subparagraph shall not apply if all contractors, subcontractors, and craft unions performing work on the development are subject to a multicraft project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. The multicraft project labor agreement shall include all construction crafts with applicable coverage determinations for the specified scopes of work on the project pursuant to Section 1773 of the Labor Code and shall be executed by all applicable labor organizations regardless of affiliation. For purposes of this clause, “project labor agreement” means a prehire collective bargaining agreement that establishes terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project or projects and is an agreement described in Section 158(f) of Title 29 of the United States Code.(III) Requirements set forth in this subparagraph shall not apply to projects where 100 percent of the units, exclusive of a manager’s unit or units, are dedicated to lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(iii) If the skilled and trained workforce requirements of this subparagraph apply, the prime contractor shall require subcontractors to provide, and subcontractors on the project shall provide, the following to the prime contractor:(I) An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury that a skilled and trained workforce shall be employed on the project.(II) Reports on a monthly basis, while the project or contract is being performed, demonstrating compliance with this chapter.(iv) Upon issuing any invitation or bid solicitation for the project, but no less than seven days before the bid is due, the developer shall send a notice of the invitation or solicitation that describes the project to the following entities within the jurisdiction of the proposed project site:(I) Any bona fide labor organization representing workers in the building and construction trades who may perform work necessary to complete the project and the local building and construction trades council.(II) Any organization representing contractors that may perform work necessary to complete the project, including any contractors’ association or regional builders’ exchange.(v) The developer or prime contractor shall, within three business days of a request by a joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), provide all of the following:(I) The names and Contractors State License Board numbers of the prime contractor and any subcontractors that submitted a proposal or bid for the development project.(II) The names and Contractors State License Board numbers of contractors and subcontractors that are under contract to perform construction work.(vi) (I) For all projects subject to this subparagraph, the development proponent shall provide to the locality, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating that the self-performing prime contractor and all subcontractors used a skilled and trained workforce, as defined in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code, unless otherwise exempt under this subparagraph. A monthly report provided to the locality pursuant to this subclause shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 and shall be open to public inspection. A developer that fails to provide a complete monthly report shall be subject to a civil penalty of 10 percent of the dollar value of construction work performed by that contractor on the project in the month in question, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided.(II) Any subcontractors or prime contractor self-performing work subject to the skilled and trained workforce requirements under this subparagraph that fail to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code and may be reviewed pursuant to the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Prime contractors shall not be jointly liable for violations of this subparagraph by subcontractors. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund or the locality or its labor standards enforcement agency, depending on the lead entity performing the enforcement work.(III) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind between a developer and a prime contractor that purports to delegate, transfer, or assign to a prime contractor any obligations of or penalties incurred by a developer shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.(G) A locality, and any labor standards enforcement agency the locality lawfully maintains, shall have standing to take administrative action or sue a construction contractor for failure to comply with this paragraph. A prevailing locality or labor standards enforcement agency shall distribute any wages and penalties to workers in accordance with law and retain any fees, additional penalties, or assessments.(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (8), a development that is subject to approval pursuant to this section is exempt from any requirement to pay prevailing wages, use a workforce participating in an apprenticeship, or provide health care expenditures if it satisfies both of the following:(A) The project consists of 10 or fewer units.(B) The project is not a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.(10) The development shall not be upon an existing parcel of land or site that is governed under the Mobilehome Residency Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 798) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code), the Recreational Vehicle Park Occupancy Law (Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 799.20) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code), the Mobilehome Parks Act (Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), or the Special Occupancy Parks Act (Part 2.3 (commencing with Section 18860) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code).(b) (1) (A) (i) Before submitting an application for a development subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c), the development proponent shall submit to the local government a notice of its intent to submit an application. The notice of intent shall be in the form of a preliminary application that includes all of the information described in Section 65941.1, as that section read on January 1, 2020.(ii) Upon receipt of a notice of intent to submit an application described in clause (i), the local government shall engage in a scoping consultation regarding the proposed development with any California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area, as described in Section 21080.3.1 of the Public Resources Code, of the proposed development. In order to expedite compliance with this subdivision, the local government shall contact the Native American Heritage Commission for assistance in identifying any California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development.(iii) The timeline for noticing and commencing a scoping consultation in accordance with this subdivision shall be as follows:(I) The local government shall provide a formal notice of a development proponent’s notice of intent to submit an application described in clause (i) to each California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development within 30 days of receiving that notice of intent. The formal notice provided pursuant to this subclause shall include all of the following:(ia) A description of the proposed development.(ib) The location of the proposed development.(ic) An invitation to engage in a scoping consultation in accordance with this subdivision.(II) Each California Native American tribe that receives a formal notice pursuant to this clause shall have 30 days from the receipt of that notice to accept the invitation to engage in a scoping consultation.(III) If the local government receives a response accepting an invitation to engage in a scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision, the local government shall commence the scoping consultation within 30 days of receiving that response.(B) The scoping consultation shall recognize that California Native American tribes traditionally and culturally affiliated with a geographic area have knowledge and expertise concerning the resources at issue and shall take into account the cultural significance of the resource to the culturally affiliated California Native American tribe.(C) The parties to a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be the local government and any California Native American tribe traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development. More than one California Native American tribe traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development may participate in the scoping consultation. However, the local government, upon the request of any California Native American tribe traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development, shall engage in a separate scoping consultation with that California Native American tribe. The development proponent and its consultants may participate in a scoping consultation process conducted pursuant to this subdivision if all of the following conditions are met:(i) The development proponent and its consultants agree to respect the principles set forth in this subdivision.(ii) The development proponent and its consultants engage in the scoping consultation in good faith.(iii) The California Native American tribe participating in the scoping consultation approves the participation of the development proponent and its consultants. The California Native American tribe may rescind its approval at any time during the scoping consultation, either for the duration of the scoping consultation or with respect to any particular meeting or discussion held as part of the scoping consultation.(D) The participants to a scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with all of the following confidentiality requirements:(i) Section 7927.000.(ii) Section 7927.005.(iii) Subdivision (c) of Section 21082.3 of the Public Resources Code.(iv) Subdivision (d) of Section 15120 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(v) Any additional confidentiality standards adopted by the California Native American tribe participating in the scoping consultation.(E) The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) shall not apply to a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision.(2) (A) If, after concluding the scoping consultation, the parties find that no potential tribal cultural resource would be affected by the proposed development, the development proponent may submit an application for the proposed development that is subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c).(B) If, after concluding the scoping consultation, the parties find that a potential tribal cultural resource could be affected by the proposed development and an enforceable agreement is documented between the California Native American tribe and the local government on methods, measures, and conditions for tribal cultural resource treatment, the development proponent may submit the application for a development subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c). The local government shall ensure that the enforceable agreement is included in the requirements and conditions for the proposed development.(C) If, after concluding the scoping consultation, the parties find that a potential tribal cultural resource could be affected by the proposed development and an enforceable agreement is not documented between the California Native American tribe and the local government regarding methods, measures, and conditions for tribal cultural resource treatment, the development shall not be eligible for the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c).(D) For purposes of this paragraph, a scoping consultation shall be deemed to be concluded if either of the following occur:(i) The parties to the scoping consultation document an enforceable agreement concerning methods, measures, and conditions to avoid or address potential impacts to tribal cultural resources that are or may be present.(ii) One or more parties to the scoping consultation, acting in good faith and after reasonable effort, conclude that a mutual agreement on methods, measures, and conditions to avoid or address impacts to tribal cultural resources that are or may be present cannot be reached.(E) If the development or environmental setting substantially changes after the completion of the scoping consultation, the local government shall notify the California Native American tribe of the changes and engage in a subsequent scoping consultation if requested by the California Native American tribe.(3) A local government may only accept an application for streamlined, ministerial approval pursuant to this section if one of the following applies:(A) A California Native American tribe that received a formal notice of the development proponent’s notice of intent to submit an application pursuant to subclause (I) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) did not accept the invitation to engage in a scoping consultation.(B) The California Native American tribe accepted an invitation to engage in a scoping consultation pursuant to subclause (II) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) but substantially failed to engage in the scoping consultation after repeated documented attempts by the local government to engage the California Native American tribe.(C) The parties to a scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision find that no potential tribal cultural resource will be affected by the proposed development pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).(D) A scoping consultation between a California Native American tribe and the local government has occurred in accordance with this subdivision and resulted in agreement pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).(4) A project shall not be eligible for the streamlined, ministerial process described in subdivision (c) if any of the following apply:(A) There is a tribal cultural resource that is on a national, state, tribal, or local historic register list located on the site of the project.(B) There is a potential tribal cultural resource that could be affected by the proposed development and the parties to a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision do not document an enforceable agreement on methods, measures, and conditions for tribal cultural resource treatment, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).(C) The parties to a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision do not agree as to whether a potential tribal cultural resource will be affected by the proposed development.(5) (A) If, after a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision, a project is not eligible for the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c) for any or all of the following reasons, the local government shall provide written documentation of that fact, and an explanation of the reason for which the project is not eligible, to the development proponent and to any California Native American tribe that is a party to that scoping consultation:(i) There is a tribal cultural resource that is on a national, state, tribal, or local historic register list located on the site of the project, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).(ii) The parties to the scoping consultation have not documented an enforceable agreement on methods, measures, and conditions for tribal cultural resource treatment, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4).(iii) The parties to the scoping consultation do not agree as to whether a potential tribal cultural resource will be affected by the proposed development, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4).(B) The written documentation provided to a development proponent pursuant to this paragraph shall include information on how the development proponent may seek a conditional use permit or other discretionary approval of the development from the local government.(6) This section is not intended, and shall not be construed, to limit consultation and discussion between a local government and a California Native American tribe pursuant to other applicable law, confidentiality provisions under other applicable law, the protection of religious exercise to the fullest extent permitted under state and federal law, or the ability of a California Native American tribe to submit information to the local government or participate in any process of the local government.(7) For purposes of this subdivision:(A) “Consultation” means the meaningful and timely process of seeking, discussing, and considering carefully the views of others, in a manner that is cognizant of all parties’ cultural values and, where feasible, seeking agreement. Consultation between local governments and Native American tribes shall be conducted in a way that is mutually respectful of each party’s sovereignty. Consultation shall also recognize the tribes’ potential needs for confidentiality with respect to places that have traditional tribal cultural importance. A lead agency shall consult the tribal consultation best practices described in the “State of California Tribal Consultation Guidelines: Supplement to the General Plan Guidelines” prepared by the Office of Planning and Research.(B) “Scoping” means the act of participating in early discussions or investigations between the local government and California Native American tribe, and the development proponent if authorized by the California Native American tribe, regarding the potential effects a proposed development could have on a potential tribal cultural resource, as defined in Section 21074 of the Public Resources Code, or California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code.(8) This subdivision shall not apply to any project that has been approved under the streamlined, ministerial approval process provided under this section before the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any local law, if a local government’s planning director or equivalent position determines that a development submitted pursuant to this section is consistent with the objective planning standards specified in subdivision (a) and pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subdivision, the local government shall approve the development. Upon a determination that a development submitted pursuant to this section is in conflict with any of the objective planning standards specified in subdivision (a), the local government staff or relevant local planning and permitting department that made the determination shall provide the development proponent written documentation of which standard or standards the development conflicts with, and an explanation for the reason or reasons the development conflicts with that standard or standards, as follows:(A) Within 60 days of submittal of the development to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.(B) Within 90 days of submittal of the development to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains more than 150 housing units.(C) Within 30 days of submittal of any development proposal that was resubmitted to address written feedback provided by the local government pursuant to this paragraph.(2) If the local government’s planning director or equivalent position fails to provide the required documentation pursuant to paragraph (1), the development shall be deemed to satisfy the objective planning standards specified in subdivision (a).(3) For purposes of this section, a development is consistent with the objective planning standards specified in subdivision (a) if there is substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the development is consistent with the objective planning standards. The local government shall not determine that a development, including an application for a modification under subdivision (h), is in conflict with the objective planning standards on the basis that application materials are not included, if the application contains substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the development is consistent with the objective planning standards.(4) Upon submittal of an application for streamlined, ministerial approval pursuant to this section to the local government, all departments of the local government that are required to issue an approval of the development prior to the granting of an entitlement shall comply with the requirements of this section within the time periods specified in paragraph (1).(d) (1) Any design review of the development may be conducted by the local government’s planning commission or any equivalent board or commission responsible for design review. That design review shall be objective and be strictly focused on assessing compliance with criteria required for streamlined projects, as well as any reasonable objective design standards published and adopted by ordinance or resolution by a local jurisdiction before submission of a development application, and shall be broadly applicable to development within the jurisdiction. That design review shall be completed, and if the development is consistent with all objective standards, the local government shall approve the development as follows and shall not in any way inhibit, chill, or preclude the ministerial approval provided by this section or its effect, as applicable:(A) Within 90 days of submittal of the development to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.(B) Within 180 days of submittal of the development to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains more than 150 housing units.(2) An application for a subdivision pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410)) shall be exempt from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) and shall be subject to the public oversight timelines set forth in paragraph (1) if the development is consistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, paragraph (8) of subdivision (a), and all objective subdivision standards in the local subdivision ordinance, and meets at least one of the following requirements:(A) The development has received or will receive financing or funding by means of a low-income housing tax credit.(B) The development is located on a legal parcel or parcels within either of the following:(i) An incorporated city, the boundaries of which include some portion of an urbanized area.(ii) An urbanized area or urban cluster in a county with a population greater than 250,000 based on the most recent United States Census Bureau data.(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the following definitions apply:(I) “Urbanized area” means an urbanized area designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.(II) “Urban cluster” means an urban cluster designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.(3) If a local government determines that a development submitted pursuant to this section is in conflict with any of the standards imposed pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall provide the development proponent written documentation of which objective standard or standards the development conflicts with, and an explanation for the reason or reasons the development conflicts with that objective standard or standards consistent with the timelines described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a local government, whether or not it has adopted an ordinance governing automobile parking requirements in multifamily developments, shall not impose automobile parking standards for a streamlined development that was approved pursuant to this section in any of the following instances:(A) The development is located within one-half mile of public transit.(B) The development is located within an architecturally and historically significant historic district.(C) When on-street parking permits are required but not offered to the occupants of the development.(D) When there is a car share vehicle located within one block of the development.(2) If the development does not fall within any of the categories described in paragraph (1), the local government shall not impose automobile parking requirements for streamlined developments approved pursuant to this section that exceed one parking space per unit.(f) Notwithstanding any law, a local government shall not require any of the following prior to approving a development that meets the requirements of this section:(1) Studies, information, or other materials that do not pertain directly to determining whether the development is consistent with the objective planning standards applicable to the development.(2) (A) Compliance with any standards necessary to receive a postentitlement permit.(B) This paragraph does not prohibit a local agency from requiring compliance with any standards necessary to receive a postentitlement permit after a permit has been issued pursuant to this section.(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “postentitlement permit” has the same meaning as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 65913.3.(g) (1) If a local government approves a development pursuant to this section, then, notwithstanding any other law, that approval shall not expire if the project satisfies both of the following requirements:(A) The project includes public investment in housing affordability, beyond tax credits.(B) At least 50 percent of the units are affordable to households making at or below 80 percent of the area median income.(2) (A) If a local government approves a development pursuant to this section, and the project does not satisfy the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1), that approval shall remain valid for three years from the date of the final action establishing that approval, or if litigation is filed challenging that approval, from the date of the final judgment upholding that approval. Approval shall remain valid for a project provided construction activity, including demolition and grading activity, on the development site that has begun pursuant to a permit issued by the local jurisdiction and is in progress. For purposes of this subdivision, “in progress” means one of the following:(i) The construction has begun and has not ceased for more than 180 days.(ii) If the development requires multiple building permits, an initial phase has been completed, and the project proponent has applied for and is diligently pursuing a building permit for a subsequent phase, provided that once it has been issued, the building permit for the subsequent phase does not lapse.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a local government may grant a project a one-time, one-year extension if the project proponent can provide documentation that there has been significant progress toward getting the development construction ready, such as filing a building permit application.(3) If the development proponent requests a modification pursuant to subdivision (h), then the time during which the approval shall remain valid shall be extended for the number of days between the submittal of a modification request and the date of its final approval, plus an additional 180 days to allow time to obtain a building permit. If litigation is filed relating to the modification request, the time shall be further extended during the pendency of the litigation. The extension required by this paragraph shall only apply to the first request for a modification submitted by the development proponent.(4) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act that added this paragraph shall also be retroactively applied to developments approved prior to January 1, 2022.(h) (1) (A) A development proponent may request a modification to a development that has been approved under the streamlined, ministerial approval process provided in subdivision (c) if that request is submitted to the local government before the issuance of the final building permit required for construction of the development.(B) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the local government shall approve a modification if it determines that the modification is consistent with the objective planning standards specified in subdivision (a) that were in effect when the original development application was first submitted.(C) The local government shall evaluate any modifications requested pursuant to this subdivision for consistency with the objective planning standards using the same assumptions and analytical methodology that the local government originally used to assess consistency for the development that was approved for streamlined, ministerial approval pursuant to subdivision (c).(D) A guideline that was adopted or amended by the department pursuant to subdivision (n) after a development was approved through the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c) shall not be used as a basis to deny proposed modifications.(2) Upon receipt of the development proponent’s application requesting a modification, the local government shall determine if the requested modification is consistent with the objective planning standard and either approve or deny the modification request within 60 days after submission of the modification, or within 90 days if design review is required.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the local government may apply objective planning standards adopted after the development application was first submitted to the requested modification in any of the following instances:(A) The development is revised such that the total square footage of construction increases by 15 percent or more or the total number of residential units decreases by 15 percent or more. The calculation of the square footage of construction increases shall not include underground space.(B) The development is revised such that the total square footage of construction increases by 5 percent or more or the total number of residential units decreases by 5 percent or more and it is necessary to subject the development to an objective standard beyond those in effect when the development application was submitted in order to mitigate or avoid a specific, adverse impact, as that term is defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 65589.5, upon the public health or safety and there is no feasible alternative method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the adverse impact. The calculation of the square footage of construction increases shall not include underground space.(C) (i) Objective building standards contained in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), including, but not limited to, building plumbing, electrical, fire, and grading codes, may be applied to all modification applications that are submitted prior to the first building permit application. Those standards may be applied to modification applications submitted after the first building permit application if agreed to by the development proponent.(ii) The amendments made to clause (i) by the act that added clause (i) shall also be retroactively applied to modification applications submitted prior to January 1, 2022.(4) The local government’s review of a modification request pursuant to this subdivision shall be strictly limited to determining whether the modification, including any modification to previously approved density bonus concessions or waivers, modifies the development’s consistency with the objective planning standards and shall not reconsider prior determinations that are not affected by the modification.(i) (1) A local government shall not adopt or impose any requirement, including, but not limited to, increased fees or inclusionary housing requirements, that applies to a project solely or partially on the basis that the project is eligible to receive ministerial or streamlined approval pursuant to this section.(2) (A) A local government shall issue a subsequent permit required for a development approved under this section if the application substantially complies with the development as it was approved pursuant to subdivision (c). Upon receipt of an application for a subsequent permit, the local government shall process the permit without unreasonable delay and shall not impose any procedure or requirement that is not imposed on projects that are not approved pursuant to this section. The local government shall consider the application for subsequent permits based upon the objective standards specified in any state or local laws that were in effect when the original development application was submitted, unless the development proponent agrees to a change in objective standards. Issuance of subsequent permits shall implement the approved development, and review of the permit application shall not inhibit, chill, or preclude the development. For purposes of this paragraph, a “subsequent permit” means a permit required subsequent to receiving approval under subdivision (c), and includes, but is not limited to, demolition, grading, encroachment, and building permits and final maps, if necessary.(B) The amendments made to subparagraph (A) by the act that added this subparagraph shall also be retroactively applied to subsequent permit applications submitted prior to January 1, 2022.(3) (A) If a public improvement is necessary to implement a development that is subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, a bicycle lane, sidewalk or walkway, public transit stop, driveway, street paving or overlay, a curb or gutter, a modified intersection, a street sign or street light, landscape or hardscape, an above-ground or underground utility connection, a water line, fire hydrant, storm or sanitary sewer connection, retaining wall, and any related work, and that public improvement is located on land owned by the local government, to the extent that the public improvement requires approval from the local government, the local government shall not exercise its discretion over any approval relating to the public improvement in a manner that would inhibit, chill, or preclude the development.(B) If an application for a public improvement described in subparagraph (A) is submitted to a local government, the local government shall do all of the following:(i) Consider the application based upon any objective standards specified in any state or local laws that were in effect when the original development application was submitted.(ii) Conduct its review and approval in the same manner as it would evaluate the public improvement if required by a project that is not eligible to receive ministerial or streamlined approval pursuant to this section.(C) If an application for a public improvement described in subparagraph (A) is submitted to a local government, the local government shall not do either of the following:(i) Adopt or impose any requirement that applies to a project solely or partially on the basis that the project is eligible to receive ministerial or streamlined approval pursuant to this section.(ii) Unreasonably delay in its consideration, review, or approval of the application.(j) (1) This section shall not affect a development proponent’s ability to use any alternative streamlined by right permit processing adopted by a local government, including the provisions of subdivision (i) of Section 65583.2.(2) This section shall not prevent a development from also qualifying as a housing development project entitled to the protections of Section 65589.5. This paragraph does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.(k) The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) does not apply to actions taken by a state agency, local government, or the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District to:(1) Lease, convey, or encumber land owned by the local government or the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District or to facilitate the lease, conveyance, or encumbrance of land owned by the local government, or for the lease of land owned by the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District in association with an eligible TOD project, as defined pursuant to Section 29010.1 of the Public Utilities Code, nor to any decisions associated with that lease, or to provide financial assistance to a development that receives streamlined approval pursuant to this section that is to be used for housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) Approve improvements located on land owned by the local government or the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District that are necessary to implement a development that receives streamlined approval pursuant to this section that is to be used for housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(l) For purposes of establishing the total number of units in a development under this chapter, a development or development project includes both of the following:(1) All projects developed on a site, regardless of when those developments occur.(2) All projects developed on sites adjacent to a site developed pursuant to this chapter if, after January 1, 2023, the adjacent site had been subdivided from the site developed pursuant to this chapter.(m) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Affordable housing cost” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) (A) Subject to the qualification provided by subparagraphs (B) and (C), “affordable rent” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) For a development for which an application pursuant to this section was submitted prior to January 1, 2019, that includes 500 units or more of housing, and that dedicates 20 percent of the total number of units, before calculating any density bonus, to housing affordable to households making at, or below, 80 percent of the area median income, affordable rent for at least 30 percent of these units shall be set at an affordable rent as defined in subparagraph (A) and “affordable rent” for the remainder of these units shall mean a rent that is consistent with the maximum rent levels for a housing development that receives an allocation of state or federal low-income housing tax credits from the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.(C) For a development that dedicates 100 percent of units, exclusive of a manager’s unit or units, to lower income households, “affordable rent” shall mean a rent that is consistent with the maximum rent levels stipulated by the public program providing financing for the development.(3) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.(4) “Development proponent” means the developer who submits a housing development project application to a local government under the streamlined ministerial review process pursuant to this section.(5) “Completed entitlements” means a housing development that has received all the required land use approvals or entitlements necessary for the issuance of a building permit.(6) “Health care expenditures” include contributions under Section 401(a), 501(c), or 501(d) of the Internal Revenue Code and payments toward “medical care,” as defined in Section 213(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.(7) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as in Section 65589.5.(8) “Locality” or “local government” means a city, including a charter city, a county, including a charter county, or a city and county, including a charter city and county.(9) “Moderate-income housing units” means housing units with an affordable housing cost or affordable rent for persons and families of moderate income, as that term is defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(10) “Production report” means the information reported pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(11) “State agency” includes every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, and commission, but does not include the California State University or the University of California.(12) (A) “Reporting period” means either of the following:(i) The first half of the regional housing needs assessment cycle.(ii) The last half of the regional housing needs assessment cycle.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), “reporting period” means annually for the City and County of San Francisco.(13) “Urban uses” means any current or former residential, commercial, public institutional, public park that is surrounded by other urban uses, parking lot or structure, transit or transportation passenger facility, or retail use, or any combination of those uses.(n) The department may review, adopt, amend, and repeal guidelines to implement uniform standards or criteria that supplement or clarify the terms, references, or standards set forth in this section. Any guidelines or terms adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(o) The determination of whether an application for a development is subject to the streamlined ministerial approval process provided by subdivision (c) is not a “project” as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.(p) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this section and for development in compliance with the requirements of this section on property owned by or leased to the state, the Department of General Services may act in the place of a locality or local government, at the discretion of the department.(q) (1) For developments proposed in a census tract that is designated either as a moderate resource area, low resource area, or an area of high segregation and poverty on the most recent “CTCAC/HCD Opportunity Map” published by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Department of Housing and Community Development, within 45 days after receiving a notice of intent, as described in subdivision (b), and before the development proponent submits an application for the proposed development that is subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c), the local government shall provide for a public meeting to be held by the city council or county board of supervisors to provide an opportunity for the public and the local government to comment on the development.(2) The public meeting shall be held at a regular meeting and be subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5).(3) If the development proposal is located within a city with a population of greater than 250,000 or the unincorporated area of a county with a population of greater than 250,000, the public meeting shall be held by the jurisdiction’s planning commission.(4) Comments may be provided by testimony during the meeting or in writing at any time before the meeting concludes.(5) The development proponent shall attest in writing that it attended the meeting described in paragraph (1) and reviewed the public testimony and written comments from the meeting in its application for the proposed development that is subject to the streamlined, ministerial approval process described in subdivision (c).(6) If the local government fails to hold the hearing described in paragraph (1) within 45 days after receiving the notice of intent, the development proponent shall hold a public meeting on the proposed development before submitting an application pursuant to this section.(r) (1) This section shall not apply to applications for developments proposed on qualified sites that are submitted on or after January 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified site” means a site that meets the following requirements:(A) The site is located within an equine or equestrian district designated by a general plan or specific or master plan, which may include a specific narrative reference to a geographically determined area or map of the same. Parcels adjoined and only separated by a street or highway shall be considered to be within an equestrian district.(B) As of January 1, 2024, the general plan applicable to the site contains, and has contained for five or more years, an equine or equestrian district designation where the site is located.(C) As of January 1, 2024, the equine or equestrian district applicable to the site is not zoned to include residential uses, but authorizes residential uses with a conditional use permit.(D) The applicable local government has an adopted housing element that is compliant with applicable law.(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this subdivision is to allow local governments to conduct general plan updates to align their general plan with applicable zoning changes.(s) The provisions of clause (iii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) relating to health care expenditures are distinct and severable from the remaining provisions of this section. However, the remaining portions of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) are a material and integral part of this section and are not severable. If any provision or application of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) is held invalid, this entire section shall be null and void.(t) (1) The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply in a coastal zone, as defined in Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code, on and after January 1, 2025.(2) In an area of the coastal zone not excluded under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), a development that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a) shall require a coastal development permit pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) of Division 20 of the Public Resources Code. A public agency with coastal development permitting authority shall approve a coastal development permit if it determines that the development is consistent with all objective standards of the local government’s certified local coastal program or, for areas that are not subject to a fully certified local coastal program, the certified land use plan of that area.(3) For purposes of this section, receipt of any density bonus, concessions, incentives, waivers or reductions of development standards, and parking ratios to which the applicant is entitled under Section 65915 shall not constitute a basis to find the project inconsistent with the local coastal program.(u) It is the policy of the state that this section be interpreted and implemented in a manner to afford the fullest possible weight to the interest of, and the approval and provision of, increased housing supply.(v) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 65913.16 of the Government Code is amended to read:65913.16. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Affordable Housing on Faith and Higher Education Lands Act of 2023.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Applicant” means a qualified developer who submits an application for streamlined approval pursuant to this section.(2) “Development proponent” means a developer that submits a housing development project application to a local government under the streamlined, ministerial review process pursuant to this chapter.(3) “Health care expenditures” include contributions pursuant to Section 501(c) or (d) or 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and payments toward “medical care” as defined in Section 213(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.(4) “Heavy industrial use” means a use that is a source, other than a Title V source, as defined by Section 39053.5 of the Health and Safety Code, that is subject to permitting by a district, as defined in Section 39025 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Health and Safety Code or the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.). A use where the only source permitted by a district is an emergency backup generator, and the source is in compliance with permitted emissions and operating limits, is not a heavy industrial use.(5) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65589.5.(6) “Independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as defined in Section 66010 of the Education Code.(7) “Light industrial use” means an industrial use that is not subject to permitting by a district, as defined in Section 39025 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) “Local government” means a city, including a charter city, county, including a charter county, or city and county, including a charter city and county.(9) “Qualified developer” means any of the following:(A) A local public entity, as defined in Section 50079 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) (i) A developer that is a nonprofit corporation, a limited partnership in which a managing general partner is a nonprofit corporation, or a limited liability company in which a managing member is a nonprofit corporation.(ii) The developer, at the time of submission of an application for development pursuant to this section, owns property or manages housing units located on property that is exempt from taxation pursuant to the welfare exemption established in subdivision (a) of Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(C) A developer that contracts with a nonprofit corporation that has received a welfare exemption under Section 214.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for properties intended to be sold to low-income families with financing in the form of zero interest rate loans.(D) A developer that the religious institution or independent institution of education, as defined in this section, has contracted with before to construct housing or other improvements to real property.(10) “Religious institution” means an institution owned, controlled, and operated and maintained by a bona fide church, religious denomination, or religious organization composed of multidenominational members of the same well-recognized religion, lawfully operating as a nonprofit religious corporation pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), or as a corporation sole pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 10000), of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.(11) “Title V industrial use” means a use that is a Title V source, as defined in Section 39053.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(12) “Use by right” means a development project that satisfies both of the following conditions:(A) The development project does not require a conditional use permit, planned unit development permit, or other discretionary local government review.(B) The development project is not a “project” for purposes of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.(c) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of a local government’s general plan, specific plan, zoning ordinance, or regulation, upon the request of an applicant, a housing development project shall be a use by right, if all of the following criteria are satisfied:(1) The development is located on land owned on or before January 1, 2024, by an independent institution of higher education or a religious institution, including ownership through an affiliated or associated nonprofit public benefit corporation organized pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).(2) The development is located on a parcel that satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4.(3) The development is located on a parcel that satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (B) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4.(4) The development is located on a parcel that satisfies the requirements specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4.(5) (A) The development is not adjoined to any site where more than one-third of the square footage on the site is dedicated to light industrial use. For purposes of this subdivision, parcels separated by only a street or highway shall be considered to be adjoined.(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), a property is “dedicated to light industrial use” if all of the following requirements are met:(i) The square footage is currently being put to a light industrial use.(ii) The most recently permitted use of the square footage is a light industrial use.(iii) The latest version of the local government’s general plan, adopted before January 1, 2022, designates the property for light industrial use.(6) The housing units on the development site are not located within 1,200 feet of a site that is either of the following:(A) A site that is currently a heavy industrial use.(B) A site where the most recent permitted use was a heavy industrial use.(7) Except as provided in paragraph (8), the housing units on the development site are not located within 1,600 feet of a site that is either of the following:(A) A site that is currently a Title V industrial use.(B) A site where the most recent permitted use was a Title V industrial use.(8) For a site where multifamily housing is not an existing permitted use, the housing units on the development site are not located within 3,200 feet of a facility that actively extracts or refines oil or natural gas.(9) One hundred percent of the development project’s total units, exclusive of a manager’s unit or units, are for lower income households, as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, except that up to 20 percent of the total units in the development may be for moderate-income households, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, and 5 percent of the units may be for staff of the independent institution of higher education or religious institution that owns the land. Units in the development shall be offered at affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or at affordable rent, as set in an amount consistent with the rent limits established by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee. The rent or sales price for a moderate-income unit shall be affordable and shall not exceed 30 percent of income for a moderate-income household or homebuyer for a unit of similar size and bedroom count in the same ZIP Code in the city, county, or city and county in which the housing development is located. The applicant shall provide the city, county, or city and county with evidence to establish that the units meet the requirements of this paragraph. All units, exclusive of any manager unit or units, shall be subject to a recorded deed restriction as provided in this paragraph for at least the following periods of time:(A) Fifty-five years for units that are rented unless a local ordinance or the terms of a federal, state, or local grant, tax credit, or other project financing requires, as a condition of the development of residential units, that the development include a certain percentage of units that are affordable to, and occupied by, low-income, lower income, very low income, or extremely low income households for a term that exceeds 55 years for rental housing units.(B) Forty-five years for units that are owner-occupied or the first purchaser of each unit participates in an equity sharing agreement as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 65915.(10) The development project complies with all objective development standards of the city or county that are not in conflict with this section.(11) If the housing development project requires the demolition of existing residential dwelling units, or is located on a site where residential dwelling units have been demolished within the last five years, the applicant shall comply with subdivision (d) of Section 66300.(12) The applicant certifies to the local government that either of the following is true for the housing development project, as applicable:(A) The entirety of the development project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.(B) A development that contains more than 10 units and is not in its entirety a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and approved by a local government pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 65912.110) of, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 65912.120) of, Chapter 4.1 shall be subject to all of the following:(i) All construction workers employed in the execution of the development shall be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs provided by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.(ii) The development proponent shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work, and shall also provide notice of all contracts for the performance of the work to the Department of Industrial Relations, in accordance with Section 1773.35 of the Labor Code, for those portions of the development that are not a public work.(iii) All contractors and subcontractors for those portions of the development that are not a public work shall comply with all of the following:(I) Pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in the programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.(II) Maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section. This subclause does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subclause, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(III) Be registered in accordance with Section 1725.6 of the Labor Code.(13) (A) The development proponent completes a Phase I environmental assessment, as defined in Section 78090 of the Health and Safety Code, and a Phase II environmental assessment, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 25403 of the Health and Safety Code, if warranted.(B) If a recognized environmental condition is found, the development proponent shall undertake a preliminary endangerment assessment, as defined in Section 78095 of the Health and Safety Code, prepared by an environmental assessor to determine the existence of any release of a hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure of future occupants to significant health hazards from any nearby property or activity.(i) If a release of hazardous substance is found to exist on the site, the release shall be removed, or any significant effect of the release shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with state and federal requirements.(ii) If a potential for exposure to significant hazards from surrounding properties or activities is found to exist, the effects of the potential exposure shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with current state and federal requirements.(14) If the development is within 500 feet of a freeway, regularly occupied areas of the building shall provide air filtration media for outside and return air that provide a minimum efficiency reporting value (MERV) of 13.(15) For a vacant site, the site does not contain tribal cultural resources, as defined in Section 21074 of the Public Resources Code, that could be affected by the development that were found pursuant to a consultation as described in Section 21080.3.1 of the Public Resources Code, and the effects of which cannot be mitigated pursuant to the process described in Section 21080.3.2 of the Public Resources Code.(d) (1) The obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to this section may be enforced by any of the following:(A) The Labor Commissioner, through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, that may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the development.(B) An underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action.(C) A joint labor-management committee through a civil action pursuant to Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code.(2) If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued pursuant to this section, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.(3) This subdivision does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing does not apply to those portions of a development that are not a public work if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker.(f) The requirement of this section to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.(g) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (12) of subdivision (c), and the requirements of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), a development of 50 or more housing units approved by a local government pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 65912.110) of, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 65912.120) of, Chapter 4.1 shall meet all of the following labor standards:(1) The development proponent shall require in contracts with construction contractors and shall certify to the local government that each contractor of any tier who will employ construction craft employees or will let subcontracts for at least 1,000 hours shall satisfy the requirements in paragraphs (2) and (3). A construction contractor is deemed in compliance with paragraphs (2) and (3) if it is signatory to a valid collective bargaining agreement that requires use of registered apprentices and expenditures on health care for employees and dependents.(2) A contractor with construction craft employees shall either participate in an apprenticeship program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code, or request the dispatch of apprentices from a state-approved apprenticeship program under the terms and conditions set forth in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this subdivision.(3) Each contractor with construction craft employees shall make health care expenditures for each employee in an amount per hour worked on the development equivalent to at least the hourly pro rata cost of a Covered California Platinum-level plan for two adults 40 years of age and two dependents 0 to 14 years of age for the Covered California rating area in which the development is located. A contractor without construction craft employees shall show a contractual obligation that its subcontractors comply with this paragraph. Qualifying expenditures shall be credited toward compliance with prevailing wage payment requirements set forth in Section 65912.130.(4) (A) The development proponent shall provide to the local government, on a monthly basis while its construction contracts on the development are being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with paragraphs (2) and (3). The report shall be considered public records under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1), and shall be open to public inspection.(B) A development proponent that fails to provide the monthly report shall be subject to a civil penalty for each month for which the report has not been provided, in the amount of 10 percent of the dollar value of construction work performed by that contractor on the development in the month in question, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to comply with paragraph (2) or (3) shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of paragraph (2) or (3).(C) Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the development using the procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments specified in Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established pursuant to Section 1771.3 of the Labor Code.(5) Each construction contractor shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code. Each construction contractor shall submit payroll records directly to the Labor Commissioner at least monthly in a format prescribed by the Labor Commissioner in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code. The records shall include a statement of fringe benefits. Upon request by a joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), the records shall be provided pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1776 of the Labor Code.(6) All construction contractors shall report any change in apprenticeship program participation or health care expenditures to the local government within 10 business days, and shall reflect those changes on the monthly report. The reports shall be considered public records pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000 of Title 1)) and shall be open to public inspection.(7) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) shall have standing to sue a construction contractor for failure to make health care expenditures pursuant to paragraph (3) in accordance with Section 218.7, 218.8, or 218.9 of the Labor Code.(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a development project that is eligible for approval as a use by right pursuant to this section may include the following ancillary uses, provided that those uses are limited to the ground floor of the development:(1) In a single-family residential zone, ancillary uses shall be limited to childcare centers, without limitation on the number of children, and facilities operated by community-based organizations for the provision of recreational, social, or educational services for use by the residents of the development and members of the local community in which the development is located.(2) In all other zones, the development may include the childcare centers and facilities described in paragraph (1), as well as any other commercial uses that are permitted without a conditional use permit or planned unit development permit.(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a development project that is eligible for approval as a use by right pursuant to this section includes any religious institutional use, or any use that was previously existing and legally permitted by the city or county on the site, if all of the following criteria are met:(1) The total square footage of nonresidential space on the site does not exceed the amount previously existing or permitted in a conditional use permit.(2) The new uses abide by the same operational conditions as contained in the previous conditional use permit.(j) A housing development project that qualifies as a use by right pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be allowed the following density, as applicable:(1) (A) If the development project is located in a zone that allows residential uses, including in single-family residential zones, the development project shall be allowed a density of the applicable density deemed appropriate to accommodate housing for lower income households identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2 and a height of one story or 11 feet above the maximum height otherwise applicable to the parcel.(B) If the local government allows for greater residential density on that parcel, or greater residential density or building heights on an adjoining parcel, than permitted in subparagraph (A), the greater density or building height shall apply, including a height of one story or 11 feet above the maximum height otherwise applicable to the parcel.(C) A housing development project that is located in a zone that allows residential uses, including in single-family residential zones, shall be eligible for a density bonus, incentives, or concessions, or waivers or reductions of development standards and parking ratios, pursuant to Section 65915.(2) (A) If the development project is located in a zone that does not allow residential uses, the development project shall be allowed a density of 40 units per acre and a height of one story or 11 feet above the maximum height otherwise applicable to the parcel.(B) If the local government allows for greater residential density or building heights on that parcel, or an adjoining parcel, than permitted in subparagraph (A), the greater density or building height shall apply, including a height of one story or 11 feet above the maximum height otherwise applicable to the parcel. A development project shall not use an incentive, waiver, or concession to increase the height of the development to greater than the height authorized under this subparagraph.(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a housing development project that is located in a zone that does not allow residential uses shall be eligible for a density bonus, incentives, or concessions, or waivers or reductions of development standards and parking ratios, pursuant to Section 65915.(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the proposed development, including any religious institutional use or any use that was previously existing and legally permitted by the city or county on the site pursuant to subdivision (j), shall provide off-street parking of up to one space per unit, unless a state law or local ordinance provides for a lower standard of parking, in which case the law or ordinance shall apply.(2) A local government shall not impose a parking requirement if either of the following is true:(A) The parcel is located within one-half mile walking distance of public transit, either a high-quality transit corridor or a major transit stop as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 21155 of the Public Resources Code.(B) There is a car share vehicle located within one block of the parcel.(l) (1) If the local government determines that the proposed development is in conflict with any of the objective planning standards specified in this section, it shall provide the development proponent written documentation of which standard or standards the development conflicts with, and an explanation for the reason or reasons the development conflicts with that standard or standards, within the following timeframes:(A) Within 60 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.(B) Within 90 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government if the development contains more than 150 housing units.(2) If the local government fails to provide the required documentation pursuant to paragraph (1), the development shall be deemed to satisfy the required objective planning standards.(3) For purposes of this section, a development is consistent with the objective planning standards if there is substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the development is consistent with the objective planning standards.(4) The determination of whether a proposed project submitted pursuant to this section is or is not in conflict with the objective planning standards is not a “project” as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.(5) Design review of the development may be conducted by the local government’s planning commission or any equivalent board or commission responsible for review and approval of development projects, or the city council or board of supervisors, as appropriate. That design review shall be objective and be strictly focused on assessing compliance with criteria required for streamlined, ministerial review of projects, as well as any reasonable objective design standards published and adopted by ordinance or resolution by a local jurisdiction before submittal of the development to the local government, and shall be broadly applicable to developments within the jurisdiction. That design review shall be completed as follows and shall not in any way inhibit, chill, or preclude the ministerial approval provided by this section or its effect, as applicable:(A) Within 90 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.(B) Within 180 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains more than 150 housing units.(6) The local government shall ensure that the project satisfies the requirements specified in subdivision (d) of Section 66300, regardless of whether the development is within or not within an affected city or within or not within an affected county.(7) If the development is consistent with all objective subdivision standards in the local subdivision ordinance, an application for a subdivision pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410)) shall be exempt from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(8) A local government’s approval of a development pursuant to this section shall, notwithstanding any other law, be subject to the expiration timeframes specified in subdivision (f) of Section 65913.4.(9) Any proposed modifications to a development project approved pursuant to this section shall be undertaken pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 65913.4.(10) A local government shall not adopt or impose any requirement, including, but not limited to, increased fees or inclusionary housing requirements, that applies to a project solely or partially on the basis that the project is eligible to receive streamlined, ministerial review pursuant to this section.(11) A local government shall issue a subsequent permit required for a development approved under this section pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65913.4.(12) A public improvement that is necessary to implement a development that is approved pursuant to this section shall be undertaken pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 65913.4.(m) This section shall not prevent a development from also qualifying as a housing development project entitled to the protections of Section 65589.5.(n) The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring residential development at greater density on land owned by independent institutions of higher education and religious institutions is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.(o) The provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) concerning health care expenditures are distinct and severable from the remaining provisions of this section. However, all other provisions of subdivision (g) are material and integral parts of this section and are not severable. If any provision of subdivision (g), exclusive of those included in paragraph (3), is held invalid, the entire section shall be invalid and shall not be given effect.(p) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 218.8 of the Labor Code is amended to read:218.8. (a) (1) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026, a direct contractor making or taking a contract in the state for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work, shall assume, and is liable for, any debt owed to a wage claimant or third party on the wage claimant’s behalf, incurred by a subcontractor at any tier acting under, by, or for the direct contractor for the wage claimant’s performance of labor included in the subject of the contract between the direct contractor and the owner.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor.(3) The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to penalties and liquidated damages only as follows:If a worker employed by a subcontractor on a private construction project is not paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution owed by the subcontractor on account of the worker’s performance of labor on that project, the direct contractor of the project is not liable for any associated penalties or liquidated damages under paragraph (2) unless the direct contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to pay the specified wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, or the direct contractor fails to comply with all of the following requirements:(A) The contractor shall monitor the payment by the subcontractor of wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, by periodic review of the subcontractor’s payroll records which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174.(B) Upon becoming aware of the failure of the subcontractor to pay the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, the contractor shall diligently take corrective action to halt or rectify the failure, including, but not limited to, retaining sufficient funds due the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project.(C) Prior to making final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project, the contractor shall obtain an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution due to the employees or the labor trust fund for all work performed on the private construction project.(4) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor and subcontractor on a private works project within 15 days of the receipt by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of a complaint of the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers.(5) A direct contractor or any other person shall not evade, or commit any act that negates, the requirements of this section. This section does not prohibit a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier from establishing by contract or enforcing any otherwise lawful remedies against a subcontractor it hires for liability created by the nonpayment of wages, fringe or other benefit payments, or contributions by that subcontractor or by a subcontractor at any tier working under that subcontractor, including liability for associated penalties and liquidated damages.(b) (1) (A) The Labor Commissioner may enforce against a direct contractor the liability for unpaid wages, liquidated damages, interest, and penalties created by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 98 or 1197.1, or through a civil action.(B) The Labor Commissioner shall notify the direct contractor and subcontractor at any tier on a private works project at least 30 days prior to a hearing held on an administrative complaint pursuant to Section 98, prior to issuance of a citation pursuant to Section 1197.1, or prior to filing a civil action, for the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name or address, and the name of the employer. The notice shall not preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional contractors or wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.(2) A third party owed fringe or other benefit payments or contributions on a wage claimant’s behalf may bring a civil action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor pursuant to subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.(3) (A) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work pursuant to subdivision (a). Prior to commencement of an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a), the committee shall provide the direct contractor and subcontractor that employed the wage claimant with at least 30 days’ notice by first-class mail. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name, and the name of the employer, and shall not limit the liability of the direct contractor or preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.(B) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the direct contractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work.(C) In a claim brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.(4) No other party may bring an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a).(5) Any liquidated damages awarded by the Labor Commissioner or the court shall be payable to the aggrieved employee.(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, property of the direct contractor may be attached, after trial, for the payment of any judgment received pursuant to this section.(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be filed within one year of the earliest of the following:(1) Recordation of the notice of completion of the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8182 of the Civil Code.(2) Recordation of a notice of cessation of the work covered by the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8188 of the Civil Code.(3) Actual completion of the work covered by the direct contract.(e) This section does not apply to work performed by an employee of the state, a special district, a city, a county, a city and county, or any political subdivision of the state.(f) (1) Upon request by a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide payroll records, which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174, of its employees who are providing labor on a private work, which payroll records shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. The payroll records must contain information sufficient to apprise the requesting party of the subcontractor’s payment status in making fringe or other benefit payments or contributions to a third party on the employee’s behalf.(2) Upon request of a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide the direct contractor award information that includes the project name, name and address of the subcontractor, the contractor with whom the subcontractor is under contract, anticipated start date, duration, and estimated journeymen and apprentice hours, and contact information for its subcontractors on the project.(3) A subcontractor’s failure to comply with this subdivision shall not relieve a direct contractor from any of the obligations contained in this section.(g) For purposes of this section, “direct contractor” and “subcontractor” have the same meanings as provided in Sections 8018 and 8046, respectively, of the Civil Code.(h) Nothing in this section shall alter the owner’s obligation to timely pay a direct contractor as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8812 of the Civil Code, or a direct contractor’s obligation to timely pay a subcontractor as set forth in Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 8814 of the Civil Code, or the penalties for failing to do so as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8818 of the Civil Code and Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code, except that the direct contractor may withhold as “disputed” all sums owed if a subcontractor does not timely provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.(i) For any contract entered into on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026, in order to withhold payments as disputed pursuant to subdivision (h), the direct contractor must specify, in its contract with the subcontractor, the specific documents and information that the direct contractor will require that the subcontractor provide under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f). Subcontractors may include the same requirements in their contracts with lower tiered subcontractors and may withhold as disputed all sums owed if a lower tiered subcontractor does not provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 5. Section 218.9 is added to the Labor Code, to read:218.9. (a) (1) For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2026, a direct contractor making or taking a contract in the state for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work, shall assume, and is liable for, any indebtedness for the performance of labor, including that described in subdivision (b) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code, incurred by a subcontractor at any tier acting under, by, or for the direct contractor included in the subject of the contract between the direct contractor and the owner. The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall be limited to payments for labor required by the subcontractor’s agreement with the laborer or the subcontractor’s collective bargaining agreement with the labor organization representing the laborer.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to any indebtedness for labor described in paragraph (1), penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor.(3) The direct contractor’s liability under this section shall extend to penalties and liquidated damages only as follows:If a worker employed by a subcontractor on a private construction project is not paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution owed by the subcontractor on account of the worker’s performance of labor on that project, the direct contractor of the project is not liable for any associated penalties or liquidated damages under paragraph (2) unless the direct contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to pay the specified wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, or the direct contractor fails to comply with all of the following requirements:(A) The contractor shall monitor the payment by the subcontractor of wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, by periodic review of the subcontractor’s payroll records which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174.(B) Upon becoming aware of the failure of the subcontractor to pay the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution to the employees or the labor trust fund, the contractor shall diligently take corrective action to halt or rectify the failure, including, but not limited to, retaining sufficient funds due the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project.(C) Prior to making final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the private construction project, the contractor shall obtain an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has paid the wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution due to the employees or the labor trust fund for all work performed on the private construction project.(4) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor and subcontractor on a private works project within 15 days of the receipt by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of a complaint of the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers.(5) A direct contractor or any other person shall not evade, or commit any act that negates, the requirements of this section. This section does not prohibit a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier from establishing by contract or enforcing any otherwise lawful remedies against a subcontractor it hires for liability created by any indebtedness for labor described in this subdivision by that subcontractor or by a subcontractor at any tier working under that subcontractor, including liability for associated penalties and liquidated damages.(b) (1) (A) The Labor Commissioner may enforce against a direct contractor the liability created by subdivision (a) pursuant to Section 98 or 1197.1, or through a civil action.(B) The Labor Commissioner shall notify the direct contractor and subcontractor at any tier on a private works project at least 30 days prior to a hearing held on an administrative complaint pursuant to Section 98, prior to issuance of a citation pursuant to Section 1197.1, or prior to filing a civil action, for the failure of a subcontractor on that private works project to pay the specified wage, fringe, or other benefit due to workers. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name or address, and the name of the employer. The notice shall not preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional contractors or wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.(2) A person or entity described in subdivision (c) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code may bring a civil action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor pursuant to subdivision (a). The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in such an action its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.(3) (A) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor or subcontractor at any tier to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the subcontractor on account of the performance of the labor on a private work pursuant to subdivision (a). Prior to commencement of an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a), the committee shall provide the direct contractor and subcontractor that employed the wage claimant with at least 30 days’ notice by first-class mail. The notice need only describe the general nature of the claim, the project name, and the name of the employer, and shall not limit the liability of the direct contractor or preclude subsequent amendments of an action to encompass additional wage claimants employed by the subcontractor.(B) A joint labor-management cooperation committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a direct contractor to enforce liability for any unpaid wage, fringe or other benefit payment or contribution, penalties or liquidated damages, and interest owed by the direct contractor on account of the performance of the labor on private work.(C) In a claim brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.(4) No other party may bring an action against a direct contractor to enforce the liability created by subdivision (a).(5) Any liquidated damages awarded by the Labor Commissioner or the court shall be payable to the aggrieved employee.(6) An action pursuant to this section shall not be based on the employer’s misclassification of the craft of a worker.(7) The remedies created by this section are cumulative of any other available remedies.(8) (A) A direct contractor that makes contribution payments pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall not be held liable pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, with respect to fringe or other benefit contributions.(B) If a direct contractor has been provided documentation that the subcontractor has been notified by the trust, plan, fund, or program that the subcontractor has failed to make timely required contribution payments for a private construction project, the direct contractor may make the contribution payments for performance of labor for that project in compliance with all of the following:(i) The direct contractor makes a payment using a joint check made payable to the subcontractor and the trust, plan, fund, or program for any fringe or other benefit payment or contribution.(ii) The subcontractor provides the name, type, number, and address of the trust, plan, fund, or program to the direct contractor.(iii) The direct contractor notifies the trust, plan, fund, or program that it has paid the subcontractor with a joint check.(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, property of the direct contractor may be attached, after trial, for the payment of any judgment received pursuant to this section.(d) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be filed within one year of the earliest of the following:(1) Recordation of the notice of completion of the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8182 of the Civil Code.(2) Recordation of a notice of cessation of the work covered by the direct contract, pursuant to Section 8188 of the Civil Code.(3) Actual completion of the work covered by the direct contract.(e) This section does not apply to work performed by an employee of the state, a special district, a city, a county, a city and county, or any political subdivision of the state.(f) (1) Upon request by a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide payroll records, which, at a minimum, contain the information set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 226, and which are payroll records as contemplated by Section 1174, of its employees who are providing labor on a private work, which payroll records shall be marked or obliterated only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. The payroll records must contain information sufficient to apprise the requesting party of the subcontractor’s payment status in making fringe or other benefit payments or contributions to a third party on the employee’s behalf.(2) Upon request of a direct contractor to a subcontractor, the subcontractor and any lower tier subcontractors under contract to the subcontractor shall provide the direct contractor award information that includes the project name, name and address of the subcontractor, the contractor with whom the subcontractor is under contract, anticipated start date, duration, and estimated journeymen and apprentice hours, and contact information for its subcontractors on the project.(3) A subcontractor’s failure to comply with this subdivision shall not relieve a direct contractor from any of the obligations contained in this section.(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Direct contractor” means a contractor that has a direct contractual relationship with an owner or any other person or entity engaging contractors or subcontractors for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building, structure, or other private work on behalf of the owner.(2) “Subcontractor” has the same meaning as provided in Section 8046 of the Civil Code.(h) Nothing in this section shall alter the owner’s obligation to timely pay a direct contractor as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8812 of the Civil Code, or a direct contractor’s obligation to timely pay a subcontractor as set forth in Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 8814 of the Civil Code, or the penalties for failing to do so as set forth in Sections 8800 and 8818 of the Civil Code and Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code, except that the direct contractor may withhold as “disputed” all sums owed if a subcontractor does not timely provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.(i) For any contract entered into on or after January 1, 2026, in order to withhold payments as disputed pursuant to subdivision (h), the direct contractor must specify, in its contract with the subcontractor, the specific documents and information that the direct contractor will require that the subcontractor provide under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f). Subcontractors may include the same requirements in their contracts with lower tiered subcontractors and may withhold as disputed all sums owed if a lower tiered subcontractor does not provide the information requested under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f), until that information is provided.(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.